Missouri, session 2026, SB1104.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 300.295 and 304.035, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 300.295 and 304.035, to read as follows:
300.295. 1. Whenever any person driving a vehicle
approaches a railroad grade crossing under any of the
circumstances stated in this section, the driver of such
vehicle shall stop within fifty feet but not less than
fifteen feet from the nearest rail of such railroad, and
shall not proceed until he can do so safely. The foregoing
requirements shall apply when:
(1) A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal
device gives warning of the immediate approach of a railroad
train or any on-track equipment;
(2) A crossing gate is lowered or when a human flagman
gives or continues to give a signal of the approach or
passage of a railroad train or any on-track equipment;
(3) An approaching railroad train or any on-track
equipment is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity
to such crossing.

SB 1104 2
2. No person shall drive any vehicle through, around
or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing
while such gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or
closed.
304.035. 1. When any person driving a vehicle
approaches a railroad grade crossing, the driver of the
vehicle shall operate the vehicle in a manner so he will be
able to stop, and he shall stop the vehicle not less than
fifteen feet and not more than fifty feet from the nearest
rail of the railroad track and shall not proceed until he
can safely do so if:
(1) A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal
device warns of the approach of a railroad train or any on-
track equipment; or
(2) A crossing gate is lowered or when a human flagman
gives or continues to give a signal or warning of the
approach or passage of a railroad train or any on-track
equipment; or
(3) An approaching railroad train or any on-track
equipment is visible and is in hazardous proximity to such
crossing; or
(4) Any other traffic sign, device or any other act,
rule, regulation or statute requires a vehicle to stop at a
railroad grade crossing.
2. No person shall drive any vehicle through, around
or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing
when a train or any on-track equipment is approaching while
such gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.
3. No person shall drive a vehicle through a railroad
crossing when there is not sufficient space to drive
completely through the crossing.

SB 1104 3
4. No person shall drive a vehicle through a railroad
crossing unless such vehicle has sufficient undercarriage
clearance necessary to prevent the undercarriage of the
vehicle from contacting the railroad crossing.
5. Every commercial motor vehicle as defined in
section 302.700 shall, upon approaching a railroad grade
crossing, be driven at a rate of speed which will permit
said commercial motor vehicle to be stopped before reaching
the nearest rail of such crossing and shall not be driven
upon or over such crossing until due caution has been taken
to ascertain that the course is clear. This section does
not apply to vehicles which are required to stop at railroad
crossings pursuant to section 304.030.
6. Any person violating the provisions of this section
is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
✓